Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-554
Legislative findings.

The Legislature
finds that:

(1) Critical
congenital heart disease is among the most common birth defects;

(2) Critical
congenital heart disease is the leading cause of death for infants born with
a birth defect;

(3) A major cause of infant mortality as a result of critical congenital
heart disease is that a significant number of newborns affected are not diagnosed
in the newborn nursery as having critical congenital heart disease; and

(4) An effective
mechanism for critical congenital heart disease screening of newborns can
reduce infant mortality.

Laws 2013, LB225, § 2.